Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 275.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 276.
General powers and duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

adopt rules that:

prescribe sanitary and safety standards for shops, schools, and other facilities used for the practice of barbering and cosmetology;

prescribe safe and sanitary practices for the performance of activities related to the practice of barbering and cosmetology;

establish standards for apprenticeships, courses, and examinations to be completed by an applicant for licensure under this chapter;

establish qualifications for licensure under this chapter as:

a barber, provided mandated formal training shall be 750 hours;

a cosmetologist, provided mandated formal training shall be 1,000 hours;

an esthetician, provided mandated formal training shall be 500 hours; and

a nail technician, provided mandated formal training shall be 200 hours; and

establish criteria for apprenticeships that would enable a person seeking licensure under this chapter to train under an appropriately qualified Vermont licensee in order to attain licensure without mandated formal training; and
(E) (i) establish criteria for apprenticeships that would enable a person seeking licensure under this chapter to train under an appropriately qualified Vermont licensee in order to attain licensure without mandated formal training; and

limit the duration of a required apprenticeship to not more than 150 percent of the duration of the corresponding formal training.

Provide general information to applicants for licensure or registration under this chapter.

Explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public.

Offer examinations at least once a year, if applications for examination are pending, and pass on the qualifications of the applicants.

The Director may inspect shops and schools and other places used for the practice of barbering and cosmetology.
(b) (1) The Director may inspect shops and schools and other places used for the practice of barbering and cosmetology.

A fee shall not be charged for initial inspections under this subsection; however, if the Director determines that it is necessary to inspect the same premises in the same ownership more than once in any two-year period, the Director shall charge a reinspection fee.

The Director may waive all or a part of the reinspection fee in accordance with criteria established by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 276a.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint one barber, one cosmetologist, one esthetician, and one nail technician for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to barbering and cosmetology. At least one of the initial appointments shall be for less than a five-year term.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint one barber, one cosmetologist, one esthetician, and one nail technician for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to barbering and cosmetology. At least one of the initial appointments shall be for less than a five-year term.

An appointee shall have not less than three years’ experience as a barber or cosmetologist immediately preceding appointment; shall be licensed as a barber or cosmetologist in Vermont; and shall be actively engaged in the practice of barbering or cosmetology in this State during incumbency.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.